Massachusetts, session 194th, H3498.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding after section 24B the following new section:-
Section 24C. (a) The undersecretary of the Department of Housing and Community
Development shall operate a low-income cooling assistance program in accordance with the
Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Act, 42 United States Code sections 8621 through 8630,
to cover the cost of an eligible household purchasing and installing an air-conditioning unit
and/or ceiling fans and/or box fan(s) up to $500 total as well as contribute funds to electric bills
if these funds are used to assist with cooling/air-conditioning during the appropriate times of the
year. To be eligible for the program, a household shall meet the following conditions: (i)
household income does not exceed 60 percent of state median income; (ii) the applicant is the
homeowner or the applicant provides a written statement from the landlord allowing the
of 2

installation of a window air-conditioning unit; provided, that no such written statement
shall be required for a box fan.
(b) Each fiscal year, the department shall dedicate at least 10 percent of the funds
allocated for the purposes of the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program to the program
established in this section. These funds will be distributed to all geographic regions in the
commonwealth and priority will be given to underserved communities/disproportionately
impacted areas based on income, housing infrastructure and density, and climate.
(c) The undersecretary of the Department of Housing and Community Development shall
submit an annual report to the joint committee on housing and the house and senate committees
on ways and means summarizing the activities of the program, including, but not limited to, the
number of applicants for the program, the number of accepted applications, a list of participating
retailers, a list of entities that assist the department in administering the program, the total
number of air-conditioning units and box fans distributed under the program, and the costs of the
program.
SECTION 2. Section 124F of Chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by replacing the paragraph with the following:-
No gas or electric company shall shut off gas or electric service to any residential
customer who cannot pay an overdue charge because of financial hardship. The department may
promulgate such rules and regulations consistent with this section as it deems reasonable and
necessary to implement the provision of this section.
of 2